District of Columbia statutes.
44-109.03

On-site medication review.

The ALR shall arrange for an on-site review by a registered nurse every 45 days to:

(1)

Supervise the administration of medications by Trained Medication Employees;

(2)

Assess the resident’s response to medication; and

(3)

Assess the resident’s ability to continue to self-administer his or her medications.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 903, 47 DCR 2647